New York, session 2025-2026, A10339.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The alcoholic beverage control law is amended by adding a 2 new section 97-e to read as follows: 3 § 97-e. Outdoor alcohol service; special event. 1. Notwithstanding any 4 provisions of section one hundred eleven-a of this chapter, or any other 5 inconsistent provisions of law, rule or regulation: 6 (a) Subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision and subdivision five 7 of this section, a city, town or county may request, and the board may 8 approve, expanded outdoor alcohol service for licensees within the whole 9 city, town, county, or within a specific area or areas of the city, 10 town, county, or as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subdivi- 11 sion for a period beginning June first, two thousand twenty-six and 12 ending July thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six. 13 (b) For licensees identified in paragraph (c) of this subdivision who 14 have requested approval from and been authorized by the board to conduct 15 outdoor alcohol service, and who are located within an area of a city, 16 town, or county that has been approved by the board for expanded outdoor 17 alcohol service, the following authorizations and requirements apply: 18 (i) all outdoor alcohol service areas may be enclosed, at the 19 licensee's discretion, by means of a permanent or movable barrier or by 20 means of a permanent fence-free demarcation; 21 (ii) for an outdoor alcohol service area enclosed by means of a perma- 22 nent or movable barrier of a minimum height specified by the board, the 23 permanent or movable barrier is not required to meet minimum height 24 requirements on sloped site conditions; 25 (iii) the openings into and out of an outdoor alcohol service area may 26 be up to a maximum distance apart as determined appropriate by the 27 applicable city, town, or county; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14840-01-6 A. 10339 2 1 (iv) licensees may share use of an outdoor alcohol service area with 2 other licensees and licensees may share use of an outdoor alcohol 3 service area with businesses that do not engage in the sale or service 4 of alcohol, subject to requirements of the board. All participating 5 licensees are jointly responsible for any violation or enforcement 6 issues unless it can be demonstrated that the violation or enforcement 7 issue was due to one or more licensee's specific conduct or action, in 8 which case the violation or enforcement applies only to those identified 9 licensees; and 10 (v) an employee of the licensee must be assigned to, but is not 11 required to be in, the outdoor alcohol service area at all times that 12 patrons are present. A direct line of sight is not required from inside 13 the licensed premises to the outdoor alcohol service area. 14 (c) The authorization in this section is available to the holder of a 15 retail on-premises license issued pursuant to sections fifty-five, 16 sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-c, sixty-four-d, eighty-one, or 17 eighty-one-a of this chapter or a manufacturing license that includes a 18 privilege to sell and/or serve alcoholic beverages at retail for 19 on-premises consumption on the licensed premises issued pursuant to 20 section thirty, thirty-one, fifty-one, fifty-one-a, fifty-eight, fifty- 21 eight-c, subdivision two-c of section sixty-one, section seventy-six, 22 seventy-six-a, seventy-six-c, or seventy-six-d of this chapter. 23 (d) A city, town or county that requests and is approved for expanded 24 outdoor alcohol service shall provide, and document the provision of: 25 (i) adequate local resources, including law enforcement patrols in the 26 area, to ensure safe operations of activities and the safety of the 27 community; and 28 (ii) services to keep the area of the jurisdiction in which the activ- 29 ities occur clean and free of litter or other remnants of the use of 30 public spaces for expanded outdoor alcohol service. 31 2. (a) A city may request, and the board may approve, expanded alcohol 32 service during events on a publicly owned civic campus in the city for a 33 period beginning June first, two thousand twenty-six and ending July 34 thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, as provided in this subdivision 35 and subject to subdivision five of this section. No more than twenty- 36 five events, up to seven of which may be multiday events, may be author- 37 ized for a city under this subdivision. 38 (b) Multiple licensees located on a publicly owned civic campus in a 39 city that has been approved under paragraph (a) of this subdivision may 40 share an alcohol service area encompassing the entire publicly owned 41 civic campus, or part of the publicly owned civic campus, so long as: 42 (i) the board approves of the event perimeter enclosing the alcohol 43 service area; 44 (ii) security and physical barriers are provided at all entry points 45 to the event; 46 (iii) the campus operator notifies the board within a minimum time 47 required by the board in rule before the event begins; 48 (iv) signage is conspicuously posted during the event notifying the 49 public that the area is in use as an expanded alcohol service area and 50 public notice of the upcoming use of the area as an expanded alcohol 51 service area was conspicuously posted at least seven days in advance; 52 and 53 (v) all participating licensees submit a joint operating plan to the 54 board for approval, in a format designated by the board, that describes: 55 (A) how the licensees will prevent the sale and service of alcohol to 56 persons under twenty-one years of age and those who appear to be intoxi- A. 10339 3 1 cated; (B) the ratio of alcohol service staff and security staff to the 2 anticipated number of attendees, subject to a ratio requirement that may 3 be set by the board; (C) training provided to staff who serve, regulate, 4 or supervise the service of alcohol including that alcohol awareness 5 training is required for all such staff; (D) the licensees' policy on 6 the number of alcoholic beverages that will be served to an individual 7 patron during one transaction, subject to a limit determined by the 8 board; (E) an explanation of the alcoholic beverage containers that will 9 be used to ensure they are significantly different from containers used 10 from nonalcoholic beverages; (F) the barriers or demarcations to be used 11 for an alcohol service area or event perimeter; and (G) other informa- 12 tion required by the board in rule. 13 (c) At the board's discretion, violations of subparagraph (iii) or 14 (iv) of paragraph (b) of this subdivision can be cause for denial of 15 approval of events conducted under this subdivision and violations of 16 subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (b) of this subdivision can also be cause 17 for denial of a license of the participating licensees or denial of 18 participation in future events under this section. 19 (d) Multiple licensees located on a publicly owned civic campus in a 20 city, town or county that has been approved under paragraph (a) of this 21 subdivision may share an indoor alcohol service area at certain times 22 authorized by the campus operator, so long as: 23 (i) the campus operator notifies the board at least seven days in 24 advance of the date licensees intend to begin operating the shared 25 indoor alcohol service area; 26 (ii) the campus operator ensures security and physical barriers are 27 provided at all entry points to the indoor alcohol service area; and 28 (iii) the licensees submit a joint operating plan to the board for 29 approval meeting the requirements of subparagraph (v) of paragraph (b) 30 of this subdivision. 31 (e) With respect to multiple licensees sharing an alcohol service area 32 as authorized under paragraph (b) or (d) of this subdivision, all 33 participating licensees are jointly responsible for any violation or 34 enforcement issues unless it can be demonstrated that the violation or 35 enforcement issue was due to one or more licensee's specific conduct or 36 action, in which case the violation or enforcement applies only to those 37 identified licensees. 38 (f) During the times a licensee is operating under the authorization 39 in this subdivision or subdivision four of this section, the licensee 40 may: 41 (i) operate without a permit from their local jurisdiction that may 42 otherwise be required to allow the business to use the public space as 43 an alcohol service area; 44 (ii) share an alcohol service area with another licensee: (A) without 45 individually requesting approval from the board's licensing division; 46 and (B) regardless of whether the licensees' property parcels or build- 47 ings are located in direct physical proximity to one another; and 48 (iii) sell and serve alcohol to customers from an alcohol service area 49 without offering food service menu options, except that any required 50 food service must still be provided within the licensed premises, and in 51 any preexisting alcohol service area operated by the licensee under the 52 board's rules that does not rely on the authorization in this section, 53 if the preexisting alcohol service area remains in place during an 54 event. 55 3. (a) The authorization in subdivisions two and four of this section 56 is available to the holder of a retail on-premises license issued pursu- A. 10339 4 1 ant to sections fifty-five, sixty-four, sixty-four-a, sixty-four-c, 2 sixty-four-d, eighty-one, or eighty-one-a of this chapter or a manufac- 3 turing license that includes a privilege to sell and/or serve alcoholic 4 beverages at retail for on-premises consumption on the licensed premises 5 issued pursuant to section thirty, thirty-one, fifty-one, fifty-one-a, 6 fifty-eight, fifty-eight-c, subdivision two-c of section sixty-one, 7 section seventy-six, seventy-six-a, seventy-six-c, or seventy-six-d of 8 this chapter. 9 (b) A caterer's license shall be issued to an eligible applicant for 10 an event open to the public and held on a publicly owned civic campus in 11 a city under subdivision two of this section or in an area or areas of a 12 jurisdiction approved under subdivision four of this section, even if 13 the sponsor of the event for which catering services are being provided 14 is not otherwise authorized under this chapter, if license and regulato- 15 ry requirements are otherwise met. 16 4. (a) A city, town or county may request, and the board may approve, 17 expanded outdoor and indoor alcohol service for licensees within an area 18 or areas of the jurisdiction for a period beginning June first, two 19 thousand twenty-six and ending July thirty-first, two thousand twenty- 20 six. The authorization in this subdivision may be used to allow expanded 21 alcohol sales and service only during a single multiday event in each 22 approved jurisdiction in either of the months of June or July of two 23 thousand twenty-six. 24 (b) Multiple licensees located within an area of a city, town or coun- 25 ty approved under this subdivision for expanded alcohol service may 26 share an alcohol service area encompassing the entire approved area or 27 areas, during the event, so long as: 28 (i) the board approves of the event perimeter enclosing the alcohol 29 service area; 30 (ii) security and physical barriers are provided at all entry points 31 to the event; 32 (iii) the applicable city, town or county through a designated offi- 33 cial notifies the board within a minimum time required by the board in 34 rule before the event begins; 35 (iv) signage is conspicuously posted during the event notifying the 36 public that the area is in use as an expanded alcohol service area and 37 public notice of the upcoming use of the area as an expanded alcohol 38 service area was conspicuously posted at least seven days in advance; 39 and 40 (v) all participating licensees submit a joint operating plan to the 41 board for approval, in a format designated by the board, that meets the 42 requirements of subparagraph (v) of paragraph (b) of subdivision two of 43 this section. 44 (c) Licensees operating under this subdivision may share use of an 45 alcohol service area with other licensees and licensees may share use of 46 an alcohol service area with businesses that do not engage in the sale 47 or service of alcohol, subject to requirements of the board. All partic- 48 ipating licensees are jointly responsible for any violation or enforce- 49 ment issues unless it can be demonstrated that the violation or enforce- 50 ment issue was due to one or more licensee's specific conduct or action, 51 in which case the violation or enforcement applies only to those identi- 52 fied licensees. 53 (d) During the times a licensee is operating under the authorization 54 in this subdivision the licensee may operate as provided in paragraph 55 (f) of subdivision two of this section. A. 10339 5 1 5. (a) The board shall impose a fee on any or all of the following 2 licensees and local governments in order to cover, but not exceed, the 3 board's administrative and enforcement costs related to activities 4 authorized under this section: 5 (i) a licensee seeking to operate under the authorization in this 6 section, as a condition to exercising privileges in this section; 7 (ii) a city, town or county applying for expanded outdoor alcohol 8 service privileges for licensees under subdivision one of this section; 9 (iii) a city applying for expanded alcohol service privileges for 10 licensees during events on a publicly owned civic campus under subdivi- 11 sion two of this section; and 12 (iv) a city, town or county applying for expanded alcohol service 13 privileges for licensees during an event under subdivision four of this 14 section in an approved area or areas of the jurisdiction. 15 (b) The board may establish an additional daily fee for each day of 16 operation at an event conducted under subdivision two or four of this 17 section. 18 6. A licensee may not sell wine in original, unopened containers for 19 on-premises consumption at events conducted under subdivision two or 20 four of this section. 21 7. The following definitions shall apply to this section, unless the 22 context clearly requires otherwise: 23 (a) "Alcohol service area" means an area in which liquor may be sold, 24 served, and consumed as authorized under this title and rules of the 25 board. 26 (b) "Board" means the state liquor authority. 27 (c) "Campus operator" means the person who has primary responsibility 28 for making managerial or executive decisions relating to operations and 29 activities at a publicly owned civic campus or the person's designee. 30 (d) "Publicly owned civic campus" means the buildings, facilities, 31 grounds, lands, and spaces owned by a city and designated as a city 32 center, and used for civic, arts, cultural, sports, and other community 33 and family events and activities, being not more than one hundred acres 34 in size on the effective date of this section. 35 8. The board shall, on an emergency basis, promulgate any rules or 36 regulations necessary for the implementation of this section, by May 37 first, two thousand twenty-six. 38 § 2. A publicly owned civic campus identified in subdivision 2 of 39 section 97-e of the alcoholic beverage control law that has requested 40 and been approved for expanded alcohol service for a period beginning 41 June 1, 2026 and ending July 31, 2026 and that uses such authorization 42 shall issue a report to the legislature and the liquor authority by 43 January 1, 2027 which shall include a description of the activities 44 conducted, the benefits realized, and challenges encountered, while this 45 section was in effect. 46 § 3. (a) By September 1, 2026, a city, town or county that has 47 requested and been approved by the liquor authority for expanded alcohol 48 service under subdivision 1, 2 or 4 of section 97-e of the alcoholic 49 beverage control law, and that uses such authorization, shall conduct a 50 public engagement review by contacting local organizations, individual 51 residents, businesses, and others in the local community where expanded 52 alcohol sales and service occurred or is occurring, to gain a balanced 53 understanding of how the activities were or are being experienced by 54 people in the community. The public engagement review required by this 55 section shall include examining: A. 10339 6 1 (i) whether adequate local resources, including law enforcement 2 patrols in the area, were or are provided during times that expanded 3 alcohol service was or is offered, to ensure community safety; 4 (ii) whether services were or are provided to keep the area of the 5 jurisdiction in which the activities occurred or are occurring clean and 6 free of litter or other remnants of the use of public spaces for 7 expanded alcohol service; and 8 (iii) the costs and benefits to the community of expanded alcohol 9 sales and service perceived by residents throughout the community. 10 (b) A city, town or county conducting a review under this subdivision 11 shall submit the results in a report to the board by September 1, 2026. 12 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that section one 13 of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed July 31, 2026.